Illinois, session 104th, HB30.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Sections 35B-25 and 204 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/35B-25)7    Sec. 35B-25. Plan of division approval.8    (a) A division shall not become effective until it is 9approved by the Director after reasonable notice and a public 10hearing, if the notice and hearing are deemed by the Director 11to be in the public interest. Any decision by the Director on 12whether or not to hold a public hearing on either a plan of 13division or an amended plan of division may be made 14independently by the Director. The Director shall hold a 15public hearing if one is requested by the dividing company. A 16hearing conducted under this Section shall be conducted in 17accordance with Article 10 of the Illinois Administrative 18Procedure Act.19    (b) The Director shall approve a plan of division unless 20the Director finds that:21        (1) the interest of any class of policyholder or 22    shareholder of the dividing company will not be properly 23    protected;  HB0030- 2 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1        (2) each new company created by the proposed division, 2    except a new company that is a nonsurviving party to a 3    merger pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 156, would be 4    ineligible to receive a license to do insurance business 5    in this State pursuant to Section 5;6        (2.5) each new company created by the proposed 7    division, except a new company that is a nonsurviving 8    party to a merger pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 9    156, that will be a member insurer of the Illinois Life and 10    Health Insurance Guaranty Association and that will have 11    policy liabilities allocated to it will not be licensed to 12    do insurance business in each state where such policies 13    were written by the dividing company; 14        (3) the proposed division violates a provision of the 15    Uniform Voidable Transactions Fraudulent Transfer Act;16        (4) the division is being made for purposes of 17    hindering, delaying, or defrauding any policyholders or 18    other creditors of the dividing company;19        (5) one or more resulting companies will not be 20    solvent upon the consummation of the division; or21        (6) the remaining assets of one or more resulting 22    companies will be, upon consummation of a division, 23    unreasonably small in relation to the business and 24    transactions in which the resulting company was engaged or 25    is about to engage.26    (c) In determining whether the standards set forth in   HB0030- 3 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1paragraph (3) of subsection (b) have been satisfied, the 2Director shall only apply the Uniform Voidable Transactions 3Fraudulent Transfer Act to a dividing company in its capacity 4as a resulting company and shall not apply the Uniform 5Voidable Transactions Fraudulent Transfer Act to any dividing 6company that is not proposed to survive the division.7    (d) In determining whether the standards set forth in 8paragraphs (3), (4), (5), and (6) of subsection (b) have been 9satisfied, the Director may consider all proposed assets of 10the resulting company, including, without limitation, 11reinsurance agreements, parental guarantees, support or keep 12well agreements, or capital maintenance or contingent capital 13agreements, in each case, regardless of whether the same would 14qualify as an admitted asset as defined in Section 3.1.15    (e) In determining whether the standards set forth in 16paragraph (3) of subsection (b) have been satisfied, with 17respect to each resulting company, the Director shall, in 18applying the Uniform Voidable Transactions Fraudulent Transfer 19Act, treat:20        (1) the resulting company as a debtor;21        (2) liabilities allocated to the resulting company as 22    obligations incurred by a debtor;23        (3) the resulting company as not having received 24    reasonably equivalent value in exchange for incurring the 25    obligations; and26        (4) assets allocated to the resulting company as   HB0030- 4 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    remaining property.2    (f) All information, documents, materials, and copies 3thereof submitted to, obtained by, or disclosed to the 4Director in connection with a plan of division or in 5contemplation thereof, including any information, documents, 6materials, or copies provided by or on behalf of a domestic 7stock company in advance of its adoption or submission of a 8plan of division, shall be confidential and shall be subject 9to the same protection and treatment in accordance with 10Section 131.22 as documents and reports disclosed to or filed 11with the Director pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 12131.14b until such time, if any, as a notice of the hearing 13contemplated by subsection (a) is issued.14    (g) From and after the issuance of a notice of the hearing 15contemplated by subsection (a), all business, financial, and 16actuarial information that the domestic stock company requests 17confidential treatment, other than the plan of division, shall 18continue to be confidential and shall not be available for 19public inspection and shall be subject to the same protection 20and treatment in accordance with Section 131.22 as documents 21and reports disclosed to or filed with the Director pursuant 22to subsection (a) of Section 131.14b.23    (h) All expenses incurred by the Director in connection 24with proceedings under this Section, including expenses for 25the services of any attorneys, actuaries, accountants, and 26other experts as may be reasonably necessary to assist the   HB0030- 5 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1Director in reviewing the proposed division, shall be paid by 2the dividing company filing the plan of division. A dividing 3company may allocate expenses described in this subsection in 4a plan of division in the same manner as any other liability.5    (i) If the Director approves a plan of division, the 6Director shall issue an order that shall be accompanied by 7findings of fact and conclusions of law.8    (j) The conditions in this Section for freeing one or more 9of the resulting companies from the liabilities of the 10dividing company and for allocating some or all of the 11liabilities of the dividing company shall be conclusively 12deemed to have been satisfied if the plan of division has been 13approved by the Director in a final order that is not subject 14to further appeal.15    (k) If a dividing company amends its plan of division at 16any time before the plan of division becomes effective, 17including after the Director's approval of the plan or after 18any hearing has been conducted under this Section, then the 19dividing company shall file the amended plan of division for 20approval by the Director pursuant to the provisions of this 21Section. If the Director has already issued an order approving 22the dividing company's previous plan of division under 23subsection (i), then that order shall not be rescinded by the 24Director's subsequent disapproval of an amended plan.25        (1) If a hearing is conducted on the amended plan of 26    division after the Director has approved a previous plan   HB0030- 6 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    of division, then the hearing shall not be considered a 2    rehearing or a reopening of any hearing conducted on the 3    previous plan. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the 4    dividing company from requesting a rehearing or reopening 5    of any hearing conducted on any disapproved plan of 6    division, amended or otherwise.7        (2) Whether under direct review or in a hearing, the 8    Director may rely on information already submitted or 9    developed in connection with the previous plan of 10    division, as well as any findings of fact or conclusions 11    of law if a hearing has been conducted or an approval order 12    has been issued on the previous plan, to the extent the 13    information, findings, or conclusions remain relevant to 14    the amended plan of division, and the Director shall 15    collect any other information necessary to make a 16    determination under subsection (b).17        (3) The fee assessed under Section 408 for filing a 18    plan of division shall not apply to the filing of an 19    amended plan of division, but subsection (h) shall apply 20    to all proceedings related to the amended plan. 21(Source: P.A. 102-394, eff. 8-16-21; 102-578, eff. 7-1-22 (See 22Section 5 of P.A. 102-672 for effective date of P.A. 102-578); 23103-90, eff. 6-9-23.) 24    (215 ILCS 5/204)  (from Ch. 73, par. 816)25    Sec. 204. Prohibited and voidable transfers and liens.   HB0030- 7 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    (a)(1) A preference is a transfer of any of the property of 2a company to or for the benefit of a creditor, for or on 3account of an antecedent debt, made or suffered by the company 4within 2 years before the filing of a complaint under this 5Article, the effect of which may be to enable the creditor to 6obtain a greater percentage of this debt than another creditor 7of the same class would receive.8    (2) Any preference may be avoided by the Director as 9rehabilitator, liquidator, or conservator if:10        (A) the company was insolvent at the time of the 11    transfer; and12        (B) the transfer was made within 4 months before the 13    filing of the complaint; or the creditor receiving it was 14    (i) an officer, or any employee or attorney or other 15    person who was in fact in a position of comparable 16    influence in the company to an officer whether or not that 17    person held such a position, (ii) any shareholder holding, 18    directly or indirectly, more than 5% of any class of any 19    equity security issued by the company, or (iii) any other 20    person, firm, corporation, association, or aggregation of 21    individuals with whom the company did not deal at arm's 22    length.23    (3) Where the preference is voidable, the Director as 24rehabilitator, liquidator, or conservator may recover the 25property or, if it has been converted, its value from any 26person who has received or converted the property; except   HB0030- 8 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1where a bona fide purchaser or lienor has given less than fair 2equivalent value, the purchaser or lienor shall have a lien 3upon the property to the extent of the consideration actually 4given. Where a preference by way of lien or security title is 5voidable, the court may on due notice order the lien or title 6to be preserved for the benefit of the estate, in which event 7the lien or title shall pass to the Director as rehabilitator 8or liquidator.9    (b)(1) A transfer of property other than real property 10shall be deemed to be made or suffered when it becomes so far 11perfected that no subsequent lien obtainable by legal or 12equitable proceedings on a simple contract could become 13superior to the rights of the transferee.14    (2) A transfer of real property shall be deemed to be made 15or suffered when it becomes so far perfected that no 16subsequent bona fide purchaser from the company could obtain 17rights superior to the rights of the transferee.18    (3) A transfer that creates an equitable lien shall not be 19deemed to be perfected if there are available means by which a 20legal lien could be created.21    (4) A transfer not perfected before the filing of a 22complaint shall be deemed to be made immediately before the 23filing of the complaint.24    (5) The provisions of this subsection apply whether or not 25there are or were creditors who might have obtained liens or 26persons who might have become bona fide purchasers.  HB0030- 9 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    (c) For purposes of this Section:2        (1) A lien obtainable by legal or equitable 3    proceedings upon a simple contract is one arising in the 4    ordinary course of the proceedings upon the entry or 5    docketing of a judgment or decree, or upon attachment, 6    garnishment, execution, or like process, whether before, 7    upon, or after judgment or decree and whether before or 8    upon levy. It does not include liens that, under 9    applicable law, are given a special priority over other 10    liens that are prior in time.11        (2) A lien obtainable by legal or equitable 12    proceedings could become superior to the rights of a 13    transferee, or a purchaser could obtain rights superior to 14    the rights of a transferee within the meaning of 15    subsection (b) of this Section, if such consequences would 16    follow only from the lien or purchase itself, or from the 17    lien or purchase followed by any step wholly within the 18    control of the respective lienholder or purchaser, with or 19    without the aid of ministerial action by public officials. 20    A lien could not, however, become superior and a purchase 21    could not create superior rights for the purpose of 22    subsection (b) of this Section through any acts subsequent 23    to an obtaining of the lien or subsequent to a purchase 24    that requires the agreement or concurrence of any third 25    party or that requires any further judicial action or 26    ruling.  HB0030- 10 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    (d) A transfer of property for or on account of a new and 2contemporaneous consideration which is deemed under subsection 3(b) of this Section to be made or suffered after the transfer 4because of delay in perfecting it does not thereby become a 5transfer for or on account of an antecedent debt if any acts 6required by the applicable law to be performed in order to 7perfect the transfer as against liens or bona fide purchasers' 8rights are performed within 21 days or any period expressly 9allowed by the law, whichever is less. A transfer to secure a 10future loan, if the loan is actually made, or a transfer that 11becomes security for a future loan, shall have the same effect 12as a transfer for or on account of a new and contemporaneous 13consideration.14    (e) If any lien deemed voidable under part (2) of 15subsection (a) of this Section has been dissolved by the 16furnishing of a bond or other obligation, the surety on which 17has been indemnified directly or indirectly by the transfer of 18or the creation of a lien upon any property of a company before 19the filing of a complaint under this Article, the indemnifying 20transfer or lien shall also be deemed voidable.21    (f) The property affected by any lien deemed voidable 22under subsections (a) and (e) of this Section shall be 23discharged from the lien, and that property and any of the 24indemnifying property transferred to or for the benefit of a 25surety shall pass to the Director as rehabilitator or 26liquidator, except that the court may, on due notice, order   HB0030- 11 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1any such lien to be preserved for the benefit of the estate and 2the court may direct that such conveyance be executed as may be 3proper or adequate to evidence the title of the Director as 4rehabilitator or liquidator.5    (g) The court shall have summary jurisdiction over any 6proceeding by the Director as rehabilitator, liquidator, or 7conservator to hear and determine the rights of any parties 8under this Section. Reasonable notice of any hearings in the 9proceeding shall be given to all parties in interest, 10including the obligee of a releasing bond or other life 11obligation. Where an order is entered for the recovery of 12indemnifying property in kind or for the avoidance of an 13indemnifying lien, the court, upon application of any party in 14interest, shall in the same proceeding ascertain the value of 15the property or lien, and if the value is less than the amount 16for which the property is indemnity or than the amount of the 17lien, the transferee or lienholder may elect to retain the 18property or lien upon payment of its value, as ascertained by 19the court, to the Director as rehabilitator, liquidator, or 20conservator, within such reasonable times as the court shall 21fix.22    (h) The liability of the surety under the releasing bond 23or other similar obligation shall be discharged to the extent 24of the value of the indemnifying property recovered or the 25indemnifying lien nullified and avoided by the Director as 26rehabilitator, liquidator, or conservator. Where the property   HB0030- 12 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1is retained under subsection (g) of this Section, the 2liability shall be discharged to the extent of the amount paid 3to the Director as rehabilitator, liquidator, or conservator.4    (i) If a creditor has been preferred and thereafter in 5good faith gives the company further credit without security 6of any kind, for property which becomes a part of the company's 7estate, the amount of the new credit remaining unpaid at the 8time of the petition may be set off against the preference 9which would otherwise be recoverable from the creditor.10    (j) If a company shall, directly or indirectly, within 4 11months before the filing of a complaint under this Article, or 12at any time in contemplation of such a proceeding, pay money or 13transfer property to any attorney for services rendered or to 14be rendered, the transactions may be examined by the court on 15its own motion or shall be examined by the court on petition of 16the Director as rehabilitator, liquidator, or conservator and 17shall be held valid only to the extent of a reasonable amount 18to be determined by the court, and the excess may be recovered 19by the Director as rehabilitator, liquidator, or conservator 20for the benefit of the estate provided that where the attorney 21is in a position of influence in the company or an affiliate 22thereof payment of any money or the transfer of any property to 23the attorney for services rendered or to be rendered shall be 24governed by item (B) of part (2) of subsection (a) of this 25Section.26    (k)(1) An officer, director, manager, employee,   HB0030- 13 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1shareholder, member, subscriber, attorney, or other person 2acting on behalf of the company who knowingly participates in 3giving any preference when that officer, director, manager, 4employee, shareholder, member, subscriber, attorney, or other 5person has reasonable cause to believe the company is or is 6about to become insolvent at the time of the preference shall 7be personally liable to the Director as rehabilitator, 8liquidator, or conservator for the amount of the preference. 9There is a reasonable cause to so believe if the transfer was 10made within 4 months before the date of filing of the 11complaint.12    (2) A person receiving any property from the company or 13the benefit thereof as a preference voidable under subsection 14(a) of this Section shall be personally liable therefor and 15shall be bound to account to the Director as rehabilitator, 16liquidator, or conservator.17    (3) Nothing in this Section shall prejudice any other 18claim by the Director as rehabilitator, liquidator, or 19conservator against any person.20    (l) For purposes of this Section, the company is presumed 21to have been insolvent on and during the 4 month period 22immediately preceding the date of the filing of the complaint.23    (m) The Director as rehabilitator, liquidator, or 24conservator may not avoid a transfer under this Section to the 25extent that the transfer was:26        (A) Intended by the company and the creditor to or for   HB0030- 14 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    whose benefit the transfer was made to be a 2    contemporaneous exchange for new value given to the 3    company, and was in fact a substantially contemporaneous 4    exchange; or5        (B) In payment of a debt incurred by the company in the 6    ordinary course of business or financial affairs of the 7    company and the transferee; made in the ordinary course of 8    business or financial affairs of the company and the 9    transferee; and made according to ordinary business terms;10        (C) In the case of a transfer by a company where the 11    Director has determined that an event described in Section 12    35A-25 or 35A-30 has occurred, specifically approved by 13    the Director in writing pursuant to this subsection, 14    whether or not the company is in receivership under this 15    Article. Upon approval by the Director, such a transfer 16    cannot later be found to constitute a prohibited or 17    voidable transfer based solely upon a deviation from the 18    statutory payment priorities established by law for any 19    subsequent receivership; or 20        (D) Of money or other property arising under or in 21    connection with any Federal Home Loan Bank security 22    agreement or any pledge, security, collateral or guarantee 23    agreement, or any other similar arrangement or credit 24    enhancement relating to a Federal Home Loan Bank security 25    agreement. 26    (n) The Director as rehabilitator, liquidator, or   HB0030- 15 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1conservator may avoid any transfer of or lien upon the 2property of a company that the estate of the company or a 3policyholder, creditor, member, or stockholder of the company 4may have avoided, and the Director as rehabilitator, 5liquidator, or conservator may recover and collect the 6property so transferred or its value from the person to whom it 7was transferred unless the property was transferred to a bona 8fide holder for value before the filing of the complaint. The 9Director as rehabilitator, liquidator, or conservator shall be 10deemed a creditor for purposes of pursuing claims under the 11Uniform Voidable Transactions Fraudulent Transfer Act.12    (o) Notwithstanding any provision of this Article to the 13contrary, a Federal Home Loan Bank shall not be stayed, 14enjoined, or prohibited from exercising or enforcing any right 15or cause of action regarding collateral pledged under any 16security agreement or any pledge, security, collateral or 17guarantee agreement, or any other similar arrangement or 18credit enhancement relating to a Federal Home Loan Bank 19security agreement. 20(Source: P.A. 100-89, eff. 8-11-17.) 21    Section 10. The Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act is amended 22by changing the title of the Act and Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 237, 8, 9, and 10 and by adding Sections 10.1, 10.2, and 14 as 24follows:   HB0030- 16 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    (740 ILCS 160/Act title)2    An Act in relation to voidable transactions fraudulent 3transfers. 4    (740 ILCS 160/1)  (from Ch. 59, par. 101)5    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act, which was formerly cited as 6the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act, shall be known and may be 7cited as the Uniform Voidable Transactions Fraudulent Transfer 8Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-814.) 10    (740 ILCS 160/2)  (from Ch. 59, par. 102)11    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act: As used in this 12Act: 13    (a) "Affiliate" means: 14        (1) a person that who directly or indirectly owns, 15    controls, or holds with power to vote, 20% or more of the 16    outstanding voting securities of the debtor, other than a 17    person that who holds the securities: , 18            (A) as a fiduciary or agent without sole 19        discretionary power to vote the securities; or 20            (B) solely to secure a debt, if the person has not 21        in fact exercised the power to vote; 22        (2) a corporation with 20% or more outstanding voting 23    securities which are directly or indirectly owned, 24    controlled, or held with power to vote, by the debtor or a   HB0030- 17 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    person that who directly or indirectly owns, controls, or 2    holds with power to vote, 20% or more of the outstanding 3    voting securities of the debtor, other than a person that 4    who holds the securities: , 5            (A) as a fiduciary or agent without sole 6        discretionary power to vote the securities; or 7            (B) solely to secure a debt, if the person has not 8        in fact exercised the power to vote; 9            (3) a person whose business is operated by the 10        debtor under a lease or other agreement, or a person 11        substantially all of whose assets are controlled by 12        the debtor; or 13        (4) a person that who operates the debtor's business 14    under a lease or other agreement or controls substantially 15    all of the debtor's assets.16    (b) "Asset" means property of a debtor, but the term does 17not include: 18        (1) property to the extent it is encumbered by a valid 19    lien; 20        (2) property to the extent it is generally exempt 21    under nonbankruptcy law laws of this State; or 22        (3) an interest in property held in tenancy by the 23    entireties to the extent it is not subject to process by a 24    creditor holding a claim against only one tenant.25    (c) "Claim", except as used in "claim for relief", means a 26right to payment, whether or not the right is reduced to   HB0030- 18 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, contingent, 2matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, legal, equitable, 3secured, or unsecured.4    (d) "Creditor" means a person that who has a claim, 5including a claim for past-due child support.6    (e) "Debt" means liability on a claim.7    (f) "Debtor" means a person that who is liable on a claim.8    (g) "Electronic" means relating to technology having 9electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, 10electromagnetic, or similar capabilities. 11    (h) (g) "Insider" includes: 12        (1) if the debtor is an individual: , 13            (A) a relative of the debtor or of a general 14        partner of the debtor; 15            (B) a partnership in which the debtor is a general 16        partner; 17            (C) a general partner in a partnership described 18        in clause (B); or 19            (D) a corporation of which the debtor is a 20        director, officer, or person in control; 21        (2) if the debtor is a corporation: , 22            (A) a director of the debtor; 23            (B) an officer of the debtor; 24            (C) a person in control of the debtor; 25            (D) a partnership in which the debtor is a general 26        partner;   HB0030- 19 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1            (E) a general partner in a partnership described 2        in clause (D); or 3            (F) a relative of a general partner, director, 4        officer, or person in control of the debtor; 5        (3) if the debtor is a partnership: , 6            (A) a general partner in the debtor; 7            (B) a relative of a general partner in, a general 8        partner of, or a person in control of the debtor; 9            (C) another partnership in which the debtor is a 10        general partner; 11            (D) a general partner in a partnership described 12        in clause (C); or 13            (E) a person in control of the debtor; 14        (4) an affiliate, or an insider of an affiliate as if 15    the affiliate were the debtor; and 16        (5) a managing agent of the debtor.17    (i) (h) "Lien" means a charge against or an interest in 18property to secure payment of a debt or performance of an 19obligation, and includes a security interest created by 20agreement, a judicial lien obtained by legal or equitable 21process or proceedings, a common-law lien, or a statutory 22lien.23    (j) "Organization" means a person other than an 24individual. (i) "Person" means an individual, partnership, 25corporation, association, organization, government or 26governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate,   HB0030- 20 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1trust, or any other legal or commercial entity.2    (k) "Person" means an individual, estate, partnership, 3association, trust, business or nonprofit entity, public 4corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, 5or instrumentality, or other legal or commercial entity. 6    (l) (j) "Property" means anything that may be the subject 7of ownership.8    (m) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a 9tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other 10medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. 11    (n) (k) "Relative" means an individual related by 12consanguinity within the third degree as determined by the 13common law, a spouse, or an individual related to a spouse 14within the third degree as so determined, and includes an 15individual in an adoptive relationship within the third 16degree.17    (o) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or 18adopt a record:19        (1) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or20        (2) to attach to or logically associate with the 21    record an electronic symbol, sound, or process. 22    (p) (l) "Transfer" means every mode, direct or indirect, 23absolute or conditional, voluntary or involuntary, of 24disposing of or parting with an asset or an interest in an 25asset, and includes payment of money, release, lease, license, 26and creation of a lien or other encumbrance.  HB0030- 21 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    (q) (m) "Valid lien" means a lien that is effective 2against the holder of a judicial lien subsequently obtained by 3legal or equitable process or proceedings.4(Source: P.A. 90-18, eff. 7-1-97.) 5    (740 ILCS 160/3)  (from Ch. 59, par. 103)6    Sec. 3. Insolvency. 7    (a) A debtor is insolvent if, at a fair valuation, the sum 8of the debtor's debts is greater than the sum all of the 9debtor's assets at a fair valuation.10    (b) A debtor that who is generally not paying the debtor's 11his debts as they become due other than as a result of a bona 12fide dispute is presumed to be insolvent. The presumption 13imposes on the party against which the presumption is directed 14the burden of proving that the nonexistence of insolvency is 15more probable than its existence. 16    (c) A partnership is insolvent under subsection (a) if the 17sum of the partnership's debts is greater than the aggregate, 18at a fair valuation, of all of the partnership's assets and the 19sum of the excess of the value of each general partner's 20nonpartnership assets over the partner's nonpartnership debts.21    (c) (d) Assets under this Section do not include property 22that has been transferred, concealed, or removed with intent 23to hinder, delay, or defraud creditors or that has been 24transferred in a manner making the transfer voidable under 25this Act.  HB0030- 22 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    (d) (e) Debts under this Section do not include an 2obligation to the extent it is secured by a valid lien on 3property of the debtor not included as an asset.4(Source: P.A. 86-814.) 5    (740 ILCS 160/4)  (from Ch. 59, par. 104)6    Sec. 4. Value. 7    (a) Value is given for a transfer or an obligation if, in 8exchange for the transfer or obligation, property is 9transferred or an antecedent debt is secured or satisfied, but 10value does not include an unperformed promise made otherwise 11than in the ordinary course of the promisor's business to 12furnish support to the debtor or another person.13    (b) For the purposes of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of 14Section 5 and Section 6, a person gives a reasonably 15equivalent value if the person acquires an interest of the 16debtor in an asset pursuant to a regularly conducted, 17noncollusive foreclosure sale or execution of a power of sale 18for the acquisition or disposition of the interest of the 19debtor upon default under a mortgage, deed of trust, or 20security agreement.21    (c) A transfer is made for present value if the exchange 22between the debtor and the transferee is intended by them to be 23contemporaneous and is in fact substantially contemporaneous.24(Source: P.A. 86-814.)   HB0030- 23 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    (740 ILCS 160/5)  (from Ch. 59, par. 105)2    Sec. 5. Transfer or obligation voidable as to present or 3future creditor. 4    (a) A transfer made or obligation incurred by a debtor is 5voidable fraudulent as to a creditor, whether the creditor's 6claim arose before or after the transfer was made or the 7obligation was incurred, if the debtor made the transfer or 8incurred the obligation:9        (1) with actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud 10    any creditor of the debtor; or11        (2) without receiving a reasonably equivalent value in 12    exchange for the transfer or obligation, and the debtor:13            (A) was engaged or was about to engage in a 14        business or a transaction for which the remaining 15        assets of the debtor were unreasonably small in 16        relation to the business or transaction; or17            (B) intended to incur, or believed or reasonably 18        should have believed that the debtor he would incur, 19        debts beyond the debtor's his ability to pay as they 20        became due.21    (b) In determining actual intent under paragraph (1) of 22subsection (a), consideration may be given, among other 23factors, to whether:24        (1) the transfer or obligation was to an insider;25        (2) the debtor retained possession or control of the 26    property transferred after the transfer;  HB0030- 24 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1        (3) the transfer or obligation was disclosed or 2    concealed;3        (4) before the transfer was made or obligation was 4    incurred, the debtor had been sued or threatened with 5    suit;6        (5) the transfer was of substantially all the debtor's 7    assets;8        (6) the debtor absconded;9        (7) the debtor removed or concealed assets;10        (8) the value of the consideration received by the 11    debtor was reasonably equivalent to the value of the asset 12    transferred or the amount of the obligation incurred;13        (9) the debtor was insolvent or became insolvent 14    shortly after the transfer was made or the obligation was 15    incurred;16        (10) the transfer occurred shortly before or shortly 17    after a substantial debt was incurred; and18        (11) the debtor transferred the essential assets of 19    the business to a lienor that who transferred the assets 20    to an insider of the debtor.21    (c) A creditor making a claim for relief under subsection 22(a) has the burden of proving the elements of the claim for 23relief by a preponderance of the evidence. 24(Source: P.A. 86-814.) 25    (740 ILCS 160/6)  (from Ch. 59, par. 106)  HB0030- 25 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    Sec. 6. Transfer or obligation voidable as to present 2creditor. 3    (a) A transfer made or obligation incurred by a debtor is 4voidable fraudulent as to a creditor whose claim arose before 5the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred if the 6debtor made the transfer or incurred the obligation without 7receiving a reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the 8transfer or obligation and the debtor was insolvent at that 9time or the debtor became insolvent as a result of the transfer 10or obligation.11    (b) A transfer made by a debtor is voidable fraudulent as 12to a creditor whose claim arose before the transfer was made if 13the transfer was made to an insider for an antecedent debt, the 14debtor was insolvent at that time, and the insider had 15reasonable cause to believe that the debtor was insolvent.16    (c) Subject to subsection (b) of Section 3, a creditor 17making a claim for relief under subsection (a) or (b) has the 18burden of proving the elements of the claim for relief by a 19preponderance of the evidence. 20(Source: P.A. 86-814.) 21    (740 ILCS 160/7)  (from Ch. 59, par. 107)22    Sec. 7. When transfer is made or obligation is incurred. 23For the purposes of this Act: For the purposes of this Act: 24    (a) a transfer is made:25        (1) with respect to an asset that is real property   HB0030- 26 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    other than a fixture, but including the interest of a 2    seller or purchaser under a contract for the sale of the 3    asset, when the transfer is so far perfected that a 4    good-faith purchaser of the asset from the debtor against 5    which whom applicable law permits the transfer to be 6    perfected cannot acquire an interest in the asset that is 7    superior to the interest of the transferee; and8        (2) with respect to an asset that is not real property 9    or that is a fixture, when the transfer is so far perfected 10    that a creditor on a simple contract cannot acquire a 11    judicial lien otherwise than under this Act that is 12    superior to the interest of the transferee;13        (b) if applicable law permits the transfer to be 14    perfected as provided in subsection (a) and the transfer 15    is not so perfected before the commencement of an action 16    for relief under this Act, the transfer is deemed made 17    immediately before the commencement of the action;18    (c) if applicable law does not permit the transfer to be 19perfected as provided in subsection (a), the transfer is made 20when it becomes effective between the debtor and the 21transferee;22    (d) a transfer is not made until the debtor has acquired 23rights in the asset transferred; and 24    (e) an obligation is incurred:25        (1) if oral, when it becomes effective between the 26    parties; or  HB0030- 27 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1        (2) if evidenced by a record writing, when the record 2    signed writing executed by the obligor is delivered to or 3    for the benefit of the obligee.4(Source: P.A. 86-814.) 5    (740 ILCS 160/8)  (from Ch. 59, par. 108)6    Sec. 8. Remedies of creditor. 7    (a) In an action for relief against a transfer or 8obligation under this Act, a creditor, subject to the 9limitations in Section 9, may obtain:10        (1) avoidance of the transfer or obligation to the 11    extent necessary to satisfy the creditor's claim;12        (2) an attachment or other provisional remedy against 13    the asset transferred or other property of the transferee 14    if available under applicable law in accordance with the 15    procedure prescribed by the Code of Civil Procedure; and 16        (3) subject to applicable principles of equity and in 17    accordance with applicable rules of civil procedure: ,18            (A) an injunction against further disposition by 19        the debtor or a transferee, or both, of the asset 20        transferred or of other property;21            (B) appointment of a receiver to take charge of 22        the asset transferred or of other property of the 23        transferee; or24            (C) any other relief the circumstances may 25        require.  HB0030- 28 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    (b) If a creditor has obtained a judgment on a claim 2against the debtor, the creditor, if the court so orders, may 3levy execution on the asset transferred or its proceeds.4(Source: P.A. 86-814.) 5    (740 ILCS 160/9)  (from Ch. 59, par. 109)6    Sec. 9. Defenses, liability, and protection of transferee 7or obligee. 8    (a) A transfer or obligation is not voidable under 9paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 5 against a person 10that who took in good faith and for a reasonably equivalent 11value given the debtor or against any subsequent transferee or 12obligee.13    (b) To the extent a transfer is avoidable in an action by a 14creditor under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 8, 15the following rules apply: 16        (1) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, to 17    the extent a transfer is voidable in an action by a 18    creditor under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 19    8, the creditor may recover judgment judgement for the 20    value of the asset transferred, as adjusted under 21    subsection (c), or the amount necessary to satisfy the 22    creditor's claim, whichever is less. The judgment may be 23    entered against:24            (A) (1) the first transferee of the asset or the 25        person for whose benefit the transfer was made; or  HB0030- 29 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1            (B) an immediate or mediate transferee of the 2        first transferee, other than: (2) any subsequent 3        transferee other than 4                (i) a good-faith transferee that who took for 5            value; or or from any subsequent transferee.6                (ii) an immediate or mediate good-faith 7            transferee of a person described in item (i). 8        (2) Recovery pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection 9    (a) or subsection (b) of Section 8 of or from the asset 10    transferred or its proceeds, by levy or otherwise, is 11    available only against a person described in subparagraph 12    (A) or (B) of paragraph (1). 13    (c) If the judgment under subsection (b) is based upon the 14value of the asset transferred, the judgment must be for an 15amount equal to the value of the asset at the time of the 16transfer, subject to adjustment as the equities may require.17    (d) Notwithstanding voidability of a transfer or an 18obligation under this Act, a good-faith transferee or obligee 19is entitled, to the extent of the value given the debtor for 20the transfer or obligation, to: 21        (1) a lien on or a right to retain an any interest in 22    the asset transferred;23        (2) enforcement of an any obligation incurred; or24        (3) a reduction in the amount of the liability on the 25    judgment.26    (e) A transfer is not voidable under paragraph (2) of   HB0030- 30 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1subsection (a) of Section 5 or Section 6 if the transfer 2results from:3        (1) termination of a lease upon default by the debtor 4    when the termination is pursuant to the lease and 5    applicable law; or6        (2) enforcement of a security interest in compliance 7    with Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code, other than 8    acceptance of collateral in full or partial satisfaction 9    of the obligation it secures.10    (f) A transfer is not voidable under subsection (b) of 11Section 6:12        (1) to the extent the insider gave new value to or for 13    the benefit of the debtor after the transfer was made, 14    except to the extent unless the new value was secured by a 15    valid lien;16        (2) if made in the ordinary course of business or 17    financial affairs of the debtor and the insider; or18        (3) if made pursuant to a good-faith effort to 19    rehabilitate the debtor and the transfer secured present 20    value given for that purpose as well as an antecedent debt 21    of the debtor.22    (g) The following rules determine the burden of proving 23matters referred to in this Section:24        (1) A party that seeks to invoke subsection (a), (d), 25    (e), or (f) has the burden of proving the applicability of 26    that subsection.  HB0030- 31 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1        (2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3) and 2    (4), the creditor has the burden of proving each 3    applicable element of subsection (b) or (c).4        (3) The transferee has the burden of proving the 5    applicability to the transferee of item (i) or (ii) of 6    subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subsection (b).7        (4) A party that seeks adjustment under subsection (c) 8    has the burden of proving the adjustment.9    (h) The standard of proof required to establish matters 10referred to in this Section is preponderance of the evidence. 11(Source: P.A. 86-814.) 12    (740 ILCS 160/10)  (from Ch. 59, par. 110)13    Sec. 10. Extinguishment of claim for relief. A claim for 14relief cause of action with respect to a fraudulent transfer 15or obligation under this Act is extinguished unless action is 16brought:17        (a) under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 18    5, not later than within 4 years after the transfer was 19    made or the obligation was incurred or, if later, not 20    later than within one year after the transfer or 21    obligation was or could reasonably have been discovered by 22    the claimant;23        (b) under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 5 24    or subsection (a) of Section 6, not later than within 4 25    years after the transfer was made or the obligation was   HB0030- 32 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    incurred; or2        (c) under subsection (b) of Section 6, not later than 3    within one year after the transfer was made or the 4    obligation was incurred.5(Source: P.A. 86-814.) 6    (740 ILCS 160/10.1 new)7    Sec. 10.1. Governing law. 8    (a) In this Section, the following rules determine a 9debtor's location:10        (1) A debtor who is an individual is located at the 11    individual's principal residence.12        (2) A debtor that is an organization and has only one 13    place of business is located at its place of business.14        (3) A debtor that is an organization and has more than 15    one place of business is located at its chief executive 16    office.17    (b) A claim for relief in the nature of a claim for relief 18under this Act is governed by the local law of the jurisdiction 19in which the debtor is located when the transfer is made or the 20obligation is incurred. 21    (740 ILCS 160/10.2 new)22    Sec. 10.2. Application to series organization. 23    (a) In this Section:24        (1) "Protected series" means an arrangement, however   HB0030- 33 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    denominated, created by a series organization that, 2    pursuant to the law under which the series organization is 3    organized, has the characteristics set forth in paragraph 4    (2).5        (2) "Series organization" means an organization that, 6    pursuant to the law under which it is organized, has the 7    following characteristics:8            (A) The organic record of the organization 9        provides for creation by the organization of one or 10        more protected series, however denominated, with 11        respect to specified property of the organization, and 12        for records to be maintained for each protected series 13        that identify the property of or associated with the 14        protected series.15            (B) Debt incurred or existing with respect to the 16        activities of, or property of or associated with, a 17        particular protected series is enforceable against the 18        property of or associated with the protected series 19        only, and not against the property of or associated 20        with the organization or other protected series of the 21        organization.22            (C) Debt incurred or existing with respect to the 23        activities or property of the organization is 24        enforceable against the property of the organization 25        only, and not against the property of or associated 26        with a protected series of the organization.  HB0030- 34 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    (b) A series organization and each protected series of the 2organization is a separate person for purposes of this Act, 3even if for other purposes a protected series is not a person 4separate from the organization or other protected series of 5the organization. 6    (740 ILCS 160/14 new)7    Sec. 14. Relation to the Electronic Signatures in Global 8and National Commerce Act. This Act modifies, limits, or 9supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National 10Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not 11modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that Act, 15 12U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of 13any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that Act, 15 14U.S.C. Section 7003(b). 15    Section 15. The Illinois Trust Code is amended by changing 16Sections 1332 and 1335 as follows: 17    (760 ILCS 3/1332)18    Sec. 1332. Creditor claim: general power created by 19powerholder. 20    (a) In this Section, "power of appointment created by the 21powerholder" includes a power of appointment created in a 22transfer by another person to the extent the powerholder 23contributed value to the transfer.   HB0030- 35 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    (b) Appointive property subject to a general power of 2appointment created by the powerholder is subject to a claim 3of a creditor of the powerholder or of the powerholder's 4estate to the extent provided in the Uniform Voidable 5Transactions Fraudulent Transfer Act. 6    (c) Subject to subsection (b), appointive property subject 7to a general power of appointment created by the powerholder 8is not subject to a claim of a creditor of the powerholder or 9the powerholder's estate to the extent the powerholder 10irrevocably appointed the property in favor of a person other 11than the powerholder or the powerholder's estate. 12    (d) Subject to subsections (b) and (c), and 13notwithstanding the presence of a spendthrift provision or 14whether the claim arose before or after the creation of the 15power of appointment, appointive property subject to a general 16power of appointment created by the powerholder is subject to 17a claim of a creditor of: 18        (1) the powerholder, to the same extent as if the 19    powerholder owned the appointive property, if the power is 20    presently exercisable; and 21        (2) the powerholder's estate, to the extent the estate 22    is insufficient to satisfy the claim and subject to the 23    right of a decedent to direct the source from which 24    liabilities are paid, if the power is exercisable at the 25    powerholder's death. 26(Source: P.A. 101-48, eff. 1-1-20.)   HB0030- 36 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1    (760 ILCS 3/1335)2    Sec. 1335. Creditor claim: nongeneral power. 3    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and 4(c), appointive property subject to a nongeneral power of 5appointment is exempt from a claim of a creditor of the 6powerholder or the powerholder's estate. 7    (b) Appointive property subject to a nongeneral power of 8appointment is subject to a claim of a creditor of the 9powerholder or the powerholder's estate to the extent that the 10powerholder owned the property and, reserving the nongeneral 11power, transferred the property in violation of the Uniform 12Voidable Transactions Fraudulent Transfer Act. 13    (c) If the initial gift in default of appointment is to the 14powerholder or the powerholder's estate, a nongeneral power of 15appointment is treated for purposes of this Section as a 16general power. 17(Source: P.A. 101-48, eff. 1-1-20.)  HB0030- 37 -LRB104 02886 LNS 12896 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    215 ILCS 5/35B-254    215 ILCS 5/204from Ch. 73, par. 8165    740 ILCS 160/Act title6    740 ILCS 160/1from Ch. 59, par. 1017    740 ILCS 160/2from Ch. 59, par. 1028    740 ILCS 160/3from Ch. 59, par. 1039    740 ILCS 160/4from Ch. 59, par. 10410    740 ILCS 160/5from Ch. 59, par. 10511    740 ILCS 160/6from Ch. 59, par. 10612    740 ILCS 160/7from Ch. 59, par. 10713    740 ILCS 160/8from Ch. 59, par. 10814    740 ILCS 160/9from Ch. 59, par. 10915    740 ILCS 160/10from Ch. 59, par. 11016    740 ILCS 160/10.1 new17    740 ILCS 160/10.2 new18    740 ILCS 160/14 new19    760 ILCS 3/133220    760 ILCS 3/1335